Massachusetts, session 194th, H616.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 8A of Chapter 74 of the general laws, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out the section and inserting in place thereof the following:-
Section 8A. A school district may charge a fee for transportation for students in grades 7-
12 who attend an out of district vocational or agricultural school; said fee may not exceed the fee
charged to students in grades 7-12 who attend an in district school, provided that no fee shall be
required for students whose families are at or below 300% of the federal poverty level as defined
by the federal Department of Health and Human Services.
of 1